Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-706
Continuing personal jurisdiction.

Personal jurisdiction acquired by a tribunal of this state in a proceeding under the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act or other law of this state relating to a support order continues as long as a tribunal of this state has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify its order or continuing jurisdiction to enforce its order as provided by sections 42-709, 42-710, and 42-713.02.

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 6;

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 47.